Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.270

Advisory council—Duties.

The advisory council shall:

(1) Advise the governor and the department on matters relating to historic preservation; recommend measures to coordinate activities of state and local agencies, private institutions, and individuals relating to historic preservation; and advise on the dissemination of information pertaining to such activities; and

(2) Review and recommend nominations for the national register of historic places to the preservation officer and the director.

[ 1997 c 145 s 2; 1986 c 266 s 14; 1983 c 91 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.